Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.225

Emergency guardian for minor.

(1) On its own, on motion when a guardianship petition is filed under RCW 11.130.190, or on petition by a person interested in a minor's welfare, including the minor, the court may appoint an emergency guardian for the minor if the court finds:

(a) Appointment of an emergency guardian is likely to prevent substantial harm to the minor's health, safety, or welfare; and

(b) No other person appears to have authority, ability, and the willingness to act to prevent substantial harm to the minor's health, safety, or welfare.

(2) The duration of authority of an emergency guardian for a minor may not exceed sixty days and the emergency guardian may exercise only the powers specified in the order of appointment. The emergency guardian's authority may be extended once for not more than sixty days if the court finds that the conditions for appointment of an emergency guardian in subsection (1) of this section continue.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, reasonable notice of the date, time, and place of a hearing on a motion for or a petition for appointment of an emergency guardian for a minor must be given to:

(a) The minor, if the minor is twelve years of age or older;

(b) Any attorney appointed under RCW 11.130.200;

(c) Each parent of the minor;

(d) Any person, other than a parent, having care or custody of the minor; and

(e) Any other person the court determines.

(4) The court may appoint an emergency guardian for a minor without notice under subsection (3) of this section and a hearing only if the court finds from an affidavit or testimony that the minor's health, safety, or welfare will be substantially harmed before a hearing with notice on the appointment can be held. If the court appoints an emergency guardian without notice to an unrepresented minor or the attorney for a represented minor, notice of the appointment must be given not later than forty-eight hours after the appointment to the individuals listed in subsection (3) of this section. Not later than five days after the appointment, the court shall hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the appointment.

(5) Appointment of an emergency guardian under this section, with or without notice, is not a determination that a basis exists for appointment of a guardian under RCW 11.130.185.

(6) The court may remove an emergency guardian appointed under this section at any time. The emergency guardian shall make any report the court requires.

(7) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the court may extend an emergency guardianship pending the outcome of a full hearing under RCW 11.130.190 or 11.130.220.

(8) If a petition for guardianship under RCW 11.130.215 is pending, or is subsequently filed after a petition under this section, the cases shall be linked or consolidated.

[ 2022 c 243 s 1; 2020 c 312 s 108; 2019 c 437 s 209.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.